Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
Article 1. In General.
§ 65-1-81.
Counties and municipalities may contribute funds to aid construction of state highways.

Any municipality in the State of Mississippi, into or through which a designated state highway runs or is proposed to be run by the State Highway Commission, may, within the discretion of its governing authorities, contribute funds to the State Highway Commission for the purpose of aiding in the building or construction of such highway, including the construction of necessary bridges, in an amount to be determined by agreement in writing between the State Highway Commission and the governing authority of such municipality and entered in their respective minutes; but in no event shall such contribution exceed one half of one per centum of the total assessed valuation of such municipality, according to the last completed assessment roll of the taxable property therein.

Any county within the State of Mississippi, into or through which a designated state highway runs or is proposed to be run by the State Highway Commission, whether within or without a municipality, may, within the discretion of its board of supervisors, contribute funds to the State Highway Commission for the purpose of aiding in the building or construction of such highway, including the construction of necessary bridges, in an amount to be determined by agreement in writing between the State Highway Commission and the board of supervisors of such county and entered in their respective minutes; but in no event shall such contribution exceed one fifth of one per centum of the total assessed valuation of such county, according to the last completed assessment roll of the taxable property therein.

Any municipality or county, exercising any of the powers granted herein, is hereby authorized and empowered to issue general obligation bonds to provide funds for the aforesaid purpose. Any municipality issuing such bonds shall proceed in compliance with the provisions of Sections 21-33-301 through 21-33-329, Mississippi Code of 1972, and any county issuing such bonds shall proceed in compliance with the provisions of Sections 19-9-1 through 19-9-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, and all such bonds shall be sold in the manner provided by Section 31-19-25, Mississippi Code of 1972. However, where a municipality and county jointly obligate themselves to make contributions to the State Highway Commission, as provided herein, such municipality and such county may enter into an agreement to be spread on the minutes of the board of supervisors of such county and the minutes of the governing authority of such municipality, under which the municipality may issue bonds to raise funds for both the municipality and county, or the county may issue bonds to raise funds for both the county and municipality. Any such agreement may provide that in lieu of issuing its bonds hereunder, the municipality or the county, as the case may be, may contribute money to the other annually or semiannually in such amount and for such period of time as may be agreed upon by the two governing authorities, for the purpose of retiring its portion of the bonds issued by the other; and the obligation assumed by the nonissuing authority may be pledged in addition to the full faith, credit, and resources of the issuing authority for the payment of such bonds as they mature and the interest thereon as it may accrue. Both the municipality and the county, by their respective governing authorities, are hereby authorized and empowered to levy and collect the necessary ad valorem taxes on all taxable property within their respective jurisdictions sufficient to retire such bonds, or to provide funds to contribute to the other authority, as required by the aforesaid agreement; when any county shall be required to make a contribution to a municipality under the terms of this section, such contribution may be made from the proceeds of a tax to be levied pursuant to the provisions of Section 65-15-7, as the same now exists or may hereafter be amended, or from any source or sources available to such county. In the event that the required funds or any part thereof are thus provided, the annual ad valorem tax hereinabove provided for may be correspondingly reduced. Any bonds issued by any municipality or any county under the terms and provisions of this section, or any pledge of contributions made by any county or municipality, shall be excepted from all limitations of indebtedness prescribed by any general or special law and shall not be considered in applying any present or future limitations of indebtedness. This section is cumulative and is in addition to any authority now exercised by counties and municipalities under any other law relating to either.

Any tax levy made to service the bonds authorized to be issued under authority of this section shall not be refundable under the homestead exemption laws of this state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8036.5; Laws, 1963, Ex. Sess. ch. 13, §§ 1-5, eff from and after passage (approved March 2, 1963).

§ 65-1-83.
Traffic census and other surveys, inspections or studies.

The State Highway Commission shall continue through the State Highway Department to cooperate with the United States Department of Transportation, as necessary, in the taking of a traffic census and the making of other surveys, inspections or studies as said federal agency may request or require pertaining to or on the state highway system and such other roads, bridges and highways within this state as it may deem advisable.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5008; 1942, § 8040; Laws, 1930, ch. 47; Laws, 1948, ch. 332, § 16; Laws, 1979, ch. 303; Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 65-1-85.
Method of awarding contracts.

All contracts by or on behalf of the commission for the purchase of materials, equipment and supplies shall be made in compliance with Section 31-7-1 et seq. All contracts by or on behalf of the commission for construction, reconstruction or other public work authorized to be done under the provisions of this chapter, except maintenance, shall be made by the executive director, subject to the approval of the commission, only upon competitive bids after due advertisement as follows, to wit:

Advertisement for bids shall be in accordance with such rules and regulations, in addition to those herein provided, as may be adopted therefor by the commission, and the commission is authorized and empowered to make and promulgate such rules and regulations as it may deem proper, to provide and adopt standard specifications for road and bridge construction, and to amend such rules and regulations from time to time.

The advertisement shall be inserted twice, being once a week for two (2) successive weeks in a newspaper published at the seat of government in Jackson, Mississippi, having a general circulation throughout the state, and no letting shall be less than fourteen (14) days nor more than sixty (60) days after the publication of the first notice of such letting, and notices of such letting may be placed in a metropolitan paper or national trade publication.

Before advertising for such work, the executive director shall cause to be prepared and filed in the department detailed plans and specifications covering the work proposed to be done and copies of the plans and specifications shall be subject to inspection by any citizen during all office hours and made available to all prospective bidders upon such reasonable terms and conditions as may be required by the commission. A fee shall be charged equal to the cost of producing a copy of any such plans and specifications.

All such contracts shall be let to a responsible bidder with the lowest and best bid, and a record of all bids received for construction and reconstruction shall be preserved.

Each bid for such a construction and reconstruction contract must be accompanied by a cashier’s check, a certified check or bidders bond executed by a surety company authorized to do business in the State of Mississippi, in the principal amount of not less than five percent (5%) of the bid, guaranteeing that the bidder will give bond and enter into a contract for the faithful performance of the contract according to plans and specifications on file.

Bonds shall be required of the successful bidder in an amount equal to the contract price. The contract price shall mean the entire cost of the particular contract let. In the event change orders are made after the execution of a contract which results in increasing the total contract price, additional bond in the amount of the increased cost may be required. The surety or sureties on such bonds shall be a surety company or surety companies authorized to do business in the State of Mississippi, all bonds to be payable to the State of Mississippi and to be conditioned for the prompt, faithful and efficient performance of the contract according to plans and specifications, and for the prompt payment of all persons furnishing labor, material, equipment and supplies therefor. Such bonds shall be subject to the additional obligation that the principal and surety or sureties executing the same shall be liable to the state in a civil action instituted by the state at the instance of the commission or any officer of the state authorized in such cases, for double any amount in money or property the state may lose or be overcharged or otherwise defrauded of by reason of any wrongful or criminal act, if any, of the contractor, his agent or employees.

With respect to equipment used in the construction, reconstruction or other public work authorized to be done under the provisions of this chapter: the word “equipment,” in addition to all equipment incorporated into or fully consumed in connection with such project, shall include the reasonable value of the use of all equipment of every kind and character and all accessories and attachments thereto which are reasonably necessary to be used and which are used in carrying out the performance of the contract, and the reasonable value of the use thereof, during the period of time the same are used in carrying out the performance of the contract, shall be the amount as agreed upon by the persons furnishing the equipment and those using the same to be paid therefor, which amount, however, shall not be in excess of the maximum current rates and charges allowable for leasing or renting as specified in Section 65-7-95; the word “labor” shall include all work performed in repairing equipment used in carrying out the performance of the contract, which repair labor is reasonably necessary to the efficient operation of said equipment; and the words “materials” and “supplies” shall include all repair parts installed in or on equipment used in carrying out the performance of the contract, which repair parts are reasonably necessary to the efficient operation of said equipment.

The executive director, subject to the approval of the commission, shall have the right to reject any and all bids, whether such right is reserved in the notice or not.

The commission may require the prequalification of any and all bidders and the failure to comply with prequalification requirements may be the basis for the rejection of any bid by the commission. The commission may require the prequalification of any and all subcontractors before they are approved to participate in any contract awarded under this section.

The commission may adopt rules and regulations for the termination of any previously awarded contract which is not timely proceeding toward completion. The failure of a contractor to comply with such rules and regulations shall be a lawful basis for the commission to terminate the contract with such contractor. In the event of a termination under such rules and regulations, the contractor shall not be entitled to any payment, benefit or damages beyond the cost of the work actually completed.

Any contract for construction or paving of any highway may be entered into for any cost which does not exceed the amount of funds that may be made available therefor through bond issues or from other sources of revenue, and the letting of contracts for such construction or paving shall not necessarily be delayed until the funds are actually on hand, provided authorization for the issuance of necessary bonds has been granted by law to supplement other anticipated revenue, or when the department certifies to the Department of Finance and Administration and the Legislative Budget Office that projected receipts of funds by the department will be sufficient to pay such contracts as they become due and the Department of Finance and Administration determines that the projections are reasonable and receipts will be sufficient to pay the contracts as they become due. The Department of Finance and Administration shall spread such determination on its minutes prior to the letting of any contracts based on projected receipts. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the issuance of bonds, which have been authorized, at any time in the discretion of the State Bond Commission, nor to prevent investment of surplus funds in United States government bonds or State of Mississippi bonds as presently authorized by Section 12, Chapter 312, Laws of 1956.

All other contracts for work to be done under the provisions of this chapter and for the purchase of materials, equipment and supplies to be used as provided for in this chapter shall be made in compliance with Section 31-7-1 et seq.

The commission shall not empower or authorize the executive director, or any one or more of its members, or any engineer or other person to let or make contracts for the construction or repair of public roads, or building bridges, or for the purchase of material, equipment or supplies contrary to the provisions of this chapter as set forth in this section, except in cases of flood or other cases of emergency where the public interest requires that the work be done or the materials, equipment or supplies be purchased without the delay incident to advertising for competitive bids. Such emergency contracts may be made without advertisement under such rules and regulations as the commission may prescribe.

The executive director, subject to the approval of the commission, is authorized to negotiate and make agreements with communities and/or civic organizations for landscaping, beautification and maintenance of highway rights-of-way; however, nothing in this subsection shall be construed as authorization for the executive director or commission to participate in such a project to an extent greater than the average cost for maintenance of shoulders, backslopes and median areas with respect thereto.

The executive director may negotiate and enter into contracts with private parties for the mowing of grass and trimming of vegetation on the rights-of-way of state highways whenever such practice is possible and cost effective.

As an alternative to the method of awarding contracts as otherwise provided in this section, the commission may use the design-build method of contracting for the following:

Projects for the Mississippi Development Authority pursuant to agreements between both governmental entities;

Any project with an estimated cost of not more than Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00), not to exceed two (2) projects per fiscal year; and

Any project which has an estimated cost of more than Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00), not to exceed one (1) project per fiscal year.

As used in this subsection, the term “design-build” method of contracting means a contract that combines the design and construction phases of a project into a single contract and the contractor is required to satisfactorily perform, at a minimum, both the design and construction of the project.

The commission shall establish detailed criteria for the selection of the successful design-build contractor in each request for design-build proposals. The evaluation of the selection committee is a public record and shall be maintained for a minimum of ten (10) years after project completion.

The commission shall maintain detailed records on projects separate and apart from its regular record keeping. The commission shall file a report to the Legislature evaluating the design-build method of contracting by comparing it to the low-bid method of contracting. At a minimum, the report must include:

The management goals and objectives for the design-build system of management;

A complete description of the components of the design-build management system, including a description of the system the department put into place on all projects managed under the system to insure that it has the complete information on highway segment costs and to insure proper analysis of any proposal the commission receives from a highway contractor;

The accountability systems the Transportation Department established to monitor any design-build project’s compliance with specific goals and objectives for the project;

The outcome of any project or any interim report on an ongoing project let under a design-build management system showing compliance with the goals, objectives, policies and procedures the department set for the project; and

The method used by the department to select projects to be let under the design-build system of management and all other systems, policies and procedures that the department considered as necessary components to a design-build management system.

All contracts let under the provisions of this subsection shall be subject to oversight and review by the State Auditor. The State Auditor shall file a report with the Legislature on or before January 1 of each year detailing his findings with regard to any contract let or project performed in violation of the provisions of this subsection. The actual and necessary expenses incurred by the State Auditor in complying with this paragraph (e) shall be paid for and reimbursed by the Mississippi Department of Transportation out of funds made available for the contract or contracts let and project or projects performed.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to prohibit the commission from awarding or entering into contracts for the design, construction and financing of toll roads, highways and bridge projects as provided under Sections 65-43-1 and 65-43-3.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5009; 1942, § 8041; Laws, 1930, ch. 47; Laws, 1948, ch. 332, § 17; Laws, 1958, ch. 370; Laws, 1968, ch. 507, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 439, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 418, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 542, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 317; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 265; Laws, 1986, ch. 498; Laws, 1991, ch. 544, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 357, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 564, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 542, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 582, § 23; Laws, 2013, ch. 431, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 21, 2013).

§ 65-1-86.
Duty of Attorney General with respect to illegal contracts or criminal acts.

The Attorney General shall, with or without a request by the State Highway Commission, bring any lawsuit, in the name of the State Highway Commission, to recover any monies lost through illegal contracts, fraud, false pretense or any other criminal act, and the highway commission shall, at the direction of the Attorney General, supply internal audits or perform any other necessary act to furnish the attorney general with any evidence pertaining to such loss for use by the Attorney General in the preparation of said lawsuits.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 418, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 29, 1973).

§ 65-1-87.
Purchases of war surplus equipment, supplies and materials.

The Mississippi State Highway Commission is hereby authorized and empowered to purchase war surplus equipment, supplies, and materials from the General Services Administration of the United States of America without the necessity of advertising for bids for such materials and equipment and supplies, even though the cost of such materials, equipment, and supplies exceed the sum of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), provided that such equipment, materials, and supplies shall be purchased for less than the then prevailing market price.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8041.5; Laws, 1960, ch. 361, §§ 1-3.

§ 65-1-89.
Contract arbitration provisions.

Every formal contract made by or on behalf of the Mississippi Transportation Commission for the construction of any building, highway, or work, or the doing of any repairs shall contain and include a provision for settlement by arbitration, if requested by either party to the contract, of all claims and disputes and other matters arising out of such contract, or the failure or refusal to perform the whole or any part thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8041.3; Laws, 1970, ch. 425, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 502, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 65-1-91.
Arbitration proceedings and effect.

Upon demand for arbitration by any party to a contract with the Mississippi Transportation Commission for the construction of any building, highway or work, or the doing of any repairs, such arbitration shall proceed in all respects and shall have the same effect as authorized and provided by Sections 11-15-1 through 11-15-37. Any arbitration decision shall be binding.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8041.4; Laws, 1970, ch. 425, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 495, § 33; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1985, ch. 474, § 21; Laws, 1986, ch. 438, § 47; Laws, 1987, ch 483, § 48; Laws, 1988, ch. 442, § 45; Laws, 1989, ch. 537, § 43; Laws, 1990, ch. 518, § 44; Laws, 1991, ch. 618, § 44; Laws, 1992, ch. 491, § 46; Laws, 2007, ch. 502, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§§ 65-1-93 through 65-1-109.
Superseded.

Superseded by Chapter 39 of Title 43, Mississippi Code of 1972.

[Codes, 1942, §§ 8023.5-01 to 8023.5-09; Laws, 1970, ch. 440, §§ 1-9; 1971, ch. 508, §§ 1-5]

§ 65-1-110.
Mississippi Department of Transportation Equipment Purchase Fund established.

There is hereby created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the Mississippi Department of Transportation Equipment Purchase Fund into which shall be deposited such funds as may be appropriated by the Legislature, any funds obtained from the “buy back” option offered by equipment manufacturers or suppliers of certain types of equipment, funds obtained from the sale of equipment by the Mississippi Department of Transportation and funds obtained from insurance settlements with regard to equipment utilized by the Mississippi Department of Transportation. Money deposited into the fund shall not lapse at the end of any fiscal year and investment earnings on the proceeds in such special fund shall be deposited into such fund. Money from such fund shall be disbursed therefrom upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer upon requisitions signed by the Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Transportation to purchase or lease equipment for the Mississippi Department of Transportation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 544, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 65-1-111.
Highway funds; bond and interest funds.

All monies from any source provided by law shall be covered and paid into the State Treasury as other public funds are paid, and it shall be the duty of the Department of Finance and Administration to advise the Mississippi Transportation Commission of the amount of money allotted to the commission on hand from time to time. It shall be the duty of the Department of Finance and Administration to place and allocate those funds so covered into the State Treasury in the State Highway Fund. The interest earned on the investment of any highway funds shall be paid into the State Highway Fund, except as otherwise provided in Section 15 of Laws, 2004, ch. 595. If any highway bonds or notes are issued, the Transportation Commission will adopt a resolution requesting the Bond Commission to issue such bonds or notes as may be authorized and a “bond and interest sinking fund” and “note fund” shall be kept separate from the highway fund by the State Treasurer pursuant to the bond resolution adopted by the State of Mississippi Bond Commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5010; 1942, § 8042; Laws, 1930, ch. 47; Laws, 1948, ch. 332, § 19; Laws, 1980, ch. 542; Laws, 1986, ch. 330; Laws, 2000, ch. 447, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 595, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 65-1-112.
Funds to be expended on basis of state need.

No funds provided to the state highway fund shall be expended on a set division of such funds by district, but shall be expended on the basis of state needs as a whole.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 29, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 65-1-113.
Audit and budget.

The books and accounts of the Mississippi Department of Transportation shall be audited at the end of each fiscal year by the State Auditor. A copy of the audit shall be filed with the Governor, the Legislative Budget Office, and the Department of Finance and Administration and a copy kept on file in the Office of the Mississippi Transportation Commission. The audit shall be so segregated that it shall show in detail the expenditures of the Mississippi Department of Transportation for the period involved.

At a regular meeting in April of each year prior to the beginning of each July 1 fiscal year, the Mississippi Transportation Commission shall adopt a complete, detailed and itemized budget of each construction program, maintenance and administration based on information as required by the Legislative Budget Office, which budget shall not exceed a reasonably anticipated income of the commission for the succeeding fiscal year, and the essential features of such budget shall be spread at large on the minutes of the commission. A copy of the detailed budget shall be filed with the Governor and three (3) copies each with the Legislative Budget Office and the Department of Finance and Administration on or before May 30 of each year and shall cover all anticipated expenditures for construction, maintenance and all other expenditures for the ensuing fiscal year. The commission shall not make expenditures in excess of its published budget or any item thereof without written notice to the Legislative Budget Office and prior approval of the Department of Finance and Administration, except in case of extraordinary, unusual or unprecedented occurrences arising by reason of unforeseen events, floods, hurricanes or other acts of God or force majeure, in which event, upon the declaration of emergency and necessity spread at large upon the minutes, appropriate and necessary emergency expenditures may be made.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5011; 1942, § 8043; Laws, 1930, ch. 47; Laws, 1946, ch. 332, § 20; Laws, 1958, ch. 371; Laws, 1966, ch. 492, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 307; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 266; repealed, 1985, ch. 424, § 2; amnd, 1985, ch. 455, § 11; Laws, 1999, ch. 418, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 18, 1999.).

§ 65-1-115.
System of accounting.

The Department of Finance and Administration, in cooperation with the commission or its comptroller, shall formulate and prescribe a uniform system of accounting for all monies expended by the Mississippi Transportation Commission. The commission shall have prepared and issued all necessary forms, rules, and regulations for the installation and operation of said system of accounting, and it shall be the duty of the Transportation Commission, acting through its Executive Director, in allowing any account to request, by requisition the Department of Finance and Administration, that a warrant be issued therefor. The commission shall provide proper books covering requisitions to be drawn from the State Highway Fund. In the event any highway bonds or notes are issued, additional books covering a “bond and interest sinking fund” and “note fund” shall likewise be provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5012; 1942, § 8044; Laws, 1930, ch. 47; Laws, 1948, ch. 332, § 21; Laws, 1966, ch. 485, § 3; Laws, 2000, ch. 447, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2000.).

§ 65-1-117.
County and federal funds for road construction.

The board of supervisors of any county is hereby authorized in its discretion to deposit with the State Treasurer, as trustee, funds representing the county’s or district’s share of the cost of construction of any project in that county.

The State Treasurer is hereby authorized to continue to receive and deposit to the credit of the State Highway Fund, all funds from the federal government made available by it for road construction purposes, and the treasurer shall notify the commission of the amounts so received.

All accounts against the above mentioned funds shall be certified by the director of the State Highway Department, who shall request the auditor of public accounts to issue his warrant on the State Treasurer for the amount of the account, and the treasurer shall pay same if sufficient funds are available, all in the manner prescribed herein or as may be required by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5013; 1942, § 8045; Laws, 1930, ch. 47; Laws, 1948, ch. 332, § 22.

§ 65-1-119.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1985, ch. 424, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

[Codes, 1930, § 5014; 1942, § 8046; Laws, 1930, ch. 47; 1948, ch. 332, § 23]

§ 65-1-121.
Inventory and report of property.

A full, complete, and detailed inventory of all property, other than rights of ways and lands containing road building materials, shall be continued as heretofore prepared and filed by the State Highway Department. All of said properties so reported and inventoried and all other property of every kind or description shall be entered in detail and by items in or upon a card index, or other modern filing system, and thereafter all property which may be purchased or acquired by the commission shall be likewise noted and indexed in such filing system so as to keep a complete record of the identity, cost, purpose, use, and location of said property at all times, so that inventory thereof may easily be made; and when disposed of, a complete record of the disposition thereof shall likewise be made. It shall be the duty of each of the highway commissioners and of the director to make a full report annually of all monies or property that have or has come into his possession or control and to faithfully account therefor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5015; 1942, § 8047; Laws, 1930, ch. 47; Laws, 1948, ch. 332, § 24.

§ 65-1-123.
Sale or disposal of unnecessary property.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (10) of this section, whenever any personal property has been acquired in any manner by the Mississippi Transportation Commission for public use and in the opinion of the commission, all or any part of the property becomes unnecessary for public use, the commission is authorized to dispose of such property for a fair and reasonable cash market price. Any such sale shall be a sale upon the receipt of sealed bids after reasonable advertisement for bids in such manner and at such time and place as the commission may deem proper and advisable, except that the commission may sell at private sale any such personal property not necessary for public purposes the cash market value of which is less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00); however, if the personal property is timber, the commission may sell at private sale any such timber not necessary for public purposes the cash market value of which is less than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), except that whenever persons, groups or agencies are permitted to remove a quantity of timber from highway rights-of-way, and the cash market value of the timber is estimated by the commission to be less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), it shall not be necessary to have the timber cruised or appraised and the commission may sell the timber at private sale. The commission shall have the right to reject any and all bids in its discretion and to sell the property theretofore advertised at private sale for not less than the highest of the rejected bids, or to readvertise.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, whenever real property, with the exception of easements for highway purposes, has been acquired by the Mississippi Transportation Commission, in any manner, for public use and in the opinion of the commission all or any part thereof becomes unnecessary for public use, the same shall be declared on the minutes of the commission as excess property and shall be sold at private sale at market value. If the excess property was a total take from the original owner, then the commission shall offer to such owner, in writing, the first right of refusal to purchase such excess property; however, if after due diligence the original owner cannot be located, then the commission shall offer the first right of refusal to purchase the property to the adjoining property owner or owners. If the excess property was a partial take from the current owner of the parcel of real property from which the excess property was originally taken, then the commission shall be required to offer in writing the first right of refusal to purchase such excess property to such owner. If within forty-five (45) days any owner to whom the commission has offered the first right of refusal under the provisions of this subsection fails to accept the offer to purchase, the property shall then be offered to the adjoining property owner or owners. If within forty-five (45) days an adjoining property owner fails to accept the offer to purchase, then the excess property shall be sold to the highest bidder upon the receipt by the commission of sealed bids after reasonable advertisement for bids in such manner and at such time and place as the commission deems proper and advisable; however, the commission shall have the right to reject any and all bids in its discretion and to sell the property theretofore advertised at private sale for not less than the highest of the rejected bids, or to readvertise. Upon payment of the purchase price, the executive director of the department, upon due authorization by the commission entered on its minutes, may execute a quitclaim deed conveying such property to the purchaser.

Whenever the commission acquires by fee simple interest any property determined to be an uneconomic remnant outside the right-of-way, then the commission may sell the property to the adjoining property owner or owners for an amount not less than the market value established by the county tax assessor or a state licensed or certified appraiser.

Whenever the commission desires to sell any real property used as maintenance lots, the property shall be sold to the highest bidder upon the receipt by the commission of sealed bids and after reasonable advertisement for bids in such manner and at such time and place as the commission deems proper and advisable; however, the commission, in its discretion, may reject any and all bids and sell the property advertised at private sale for not less than the highest of the rejected bids, or may readvertise. Upon payment of the purchase price, the executive director of the department, upon authorization by the commission entered on its minutes, may execute a quitclaim deed conveying the property to the purchaser.

All easements for highway purposes shall be released when they are determined on the minutes of the commission as no longer needed for such purposes, and when released, they shall be filed by the department in the office of the chancery clerk in the county where the property is located.

In no instance shall any part of any property acquired by the commission, or any interest acquired in such property, including, but not limited to, easements, be construed as abandoned by nonuse, nor shall any encroachment on such property for any length of time constitute estoppel or adverse possession against the state’s interests.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the Transportation Commission shall declare property it has acquired and which is no longer needed for public purposes as excess and to sell and/or dispose of such excess property in accordance with the provisions of this section as soon as practicable after such property becomes excess in fact. Unnecessary or excess property or property interests shall be disposed of only upon order of the Transportation Commission on its minutes as provided in this section.

Whenever any real property has been acquired by the Transportation Commission and in the opinion of the commission all or any part of the property will not be utilized in the near future, the property shall be so declared by the Transportation Commission on its minutes and the commission may lease or rent the property for its market value.

This section shall not apply to any sale, donation, exchange or other conveyance of real property when the Legislature otherwise expressly authorizes or directs the commission to sell, donate, exchange or otherwise convey specifically described real property.

As an alternative to the sale of timber under subsection (1) of this section, the Mississippi Transportation Commission may enter into an agreement with the State Forestry Commission for the general supervision and management of timber on selected portions of the rights-of-way of the interstate highway system and those completed segments of four-lane highways in the state. Such an agreement may prescribe the details of, and authority and control over, the full range of forestry management practices. Seventy-five percent (75%) of any money collected from the sale of timber on rights-of-way, less any expenses associated therewith, shall be deposited into the Education Enhancement Fund created in Section 37-61-33, and the remainder shall be deposited into the State Highway Fund to be expended solely for the repair, maintenance, construction or reconstruction of highways.

Subject to the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection, the Mississippi Transportation Commission may, after consultation with the State Forestry Commission, adopt such rules and regulations with regard to the management, sale or disposal of timber on highway rights-of-way as it considers appropriate; provided, however, such rules and regulations shall be uniform throughout the state and shall be designed to maximize the value of such timber or minimize the cost of removing such timber.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8059; Laws, 1940, ch. 162; Laws, 1948, ch. 332, § 32; Laws, 1983, ch. 324; Laws, 1988, ch. 597, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 569, § 1; 1993, ch. 606, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 410, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 434, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 437, § 2; Laws, 2003, ch. 470, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2003.

§ 65-1-125.
Sale of used road building materials.

The State Highway Department is hereby authorized, in its discretion, to sell used road building materials of every kind, nature, and description to the various boards of supervisors for a reasonable and fair price. The funds received as a result of a sale contemplated by this section shall be deposited in the state treasury as required by Section 65-1-111.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8041.7; Laws, 1962, ch. 253, eff from and after passage (approved May 25, 1962).